incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="odvisnost__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="izveden/ec__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cev</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lit/er__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ru</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prispev/ek__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kih</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kov</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zob__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eh</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="izlet__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dlan__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="razhajanj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prirast/i__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vaj/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="prispevek"><i>prispev</i><par n="prispev/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dlan"><i>dlan</i><par n="dlan__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zob"><i>zob</i><par n="zob__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tekmovanje"><i>tekmovanj</i><par n="razhajanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="liter"><i>lit</i><par n="lit/er__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vaja"><i>vaj</i><par n="vaj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="razhajanje"><i>razhajanj</i><par n="razhajanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prirasti"><i>prirast</i><par n="prirast/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="korenina"><i>korenin</i><par n="vaj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izvedenec"><i>izveden</i><par n="izveden/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="odvisnost"><i>odvisnost</i><par n="odvisnost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izlet"><i>izlet</i><par n="izlet__n_m"/></e>
